Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Periodic Review of Children in Foster Care

208.680.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

208.685.
Foster care citizen review board established — Appointment of members — Additional boards authorized — Number, qualification, term and removal of members — Officers — Meetings. [Repealed.]

208.690.
Funding and support services for local boards. [Repealed.]

208.695.
Training — Oath of confidentiality. [Repealed.]

208.700.
Board to receive copies of orders of commitment and placement agreements. [Repealed.]

208.705.
Cabinet to file with court and board case permanency plan for child — Contents of plan. [Repealed.]

208.710.
Case progress report — Contents. [Repealed.]

208.715.
Board to have access to court and department records concerning child — Procedure when access denied. [Repealed.]

208.720.
Conflict of interest bars participation in review. [Repealed.]

208.725.
Review of child by board. [Repealed.]

208.730.
Appearance of witnesses before board. [Repealed.]

208.735.
Board findings and recommendations to be filed with court. [Repealed.]

208.740.
Notice to interested parties of board’s review. [Repealed.]

208.745.
State citizen review board established — Officers — Meetings — Compensation. [Repealed.]

208.750.
Duties of state citizen review board. [Repealed.]

208.755.
Funding and support services for state board. [Repealed.]

208.760.
Annual reports of local boards to state board. [Repealed.]